Washington statutes.
RCW 42.52.560

Communications from an employee organization or charitable organization—Distribution by state employee. (Effective until January 1, 2026.)

(1) Nothing in this chapter prohibits a state employee from distributing communications from an employee organization or charitable organization to other state employees if the communications do not support or oppose a ballot proposition or candidate for federal, state, or local public office. Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize any lobbying activity with public funds beyond the activity permitted by RCW 42.17A.635.

(2) "Employee organization," for purposes of this section, means any organization, union, or association in which employees participate and that exists for the purpose of collective bargaining with employers or for the purpose of opposing collective bargaining or certification of a union.

[ 2011 c 60 s 33; 2006 c 217 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 c 60: See RCW 42.17A.919.

PDFRCW 42.52.560

Communications from an employee organization or charitable organization—Distribution by state employee. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

(1) Nothing in this chapter prohibits a state employee from distributing communications from an employee organization or charitable organization to other state employees if the communications do not support or oppose a ballot proposition or candidate for federal, state, or local public office. Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize any lobbying activity with public funds beyond the activity permitted by RCW 29B.50.090.

(2) "Employee organization," for purposes of this section, means any organization, union, or association in which employees participate and that exists for the purpose of collective bargaining with employers or for the purpose of opposing collective bargaining or certification of a union.

[ 2024 c 164 s 518; 2011 c 60 s 33; 2006 c 217 s 1.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.

Effective date—2011 c 60: See note following RCW 29B.20.030.